New Jersey, session 221, S73.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    If property used in the work of non-profit associations and corporations organized exclusively for hospital purposes was exempt or partially exempt from property taxation in tax year 2015, that property shall be exempt from property taxation, to the same extent, for tax years 2022 and 2023, notwithstanding any provisions of R.S.54:4-3.6 to the contrary.  Any litigation or other action to subject such property to property taxation in tax years 2022 and 2023 is ultra vires and shall be withdrawn. 2.    a.  There is established in, but not of, the Department of the Treasury, an advisory commission to be known as the Non-Profit Hospital Property Tax Exemption Study Commission. The commission shall consist of nine members as follows: the State Treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson of the commission, ex officio; the Commissioners of Health and Community Affairs, ex officio; the Secretary of Higher Education, ex officio; the Executive Director of the New Jersey Health Care Facilities Financing Authority, ex officio; and four members, appointed by the Governor, one who shall be a member of the public with expertise in the field of property taxes and recommended by the President of the Senate, one who shall be a member of the public with expertise in the field of property taxes and recommended by the Speaker of the General Assembly, one who shall be a mayor of a municipality within which a non-profit acute care hospital is located, and one who shall be a representative of a non-profit acute care hospital or property tax-exempt institution of higher education that operates or is affiliated with a non-profit acute care hospital.  Each member may designate a representative to attend meetings of the commission, and each designee may lawfully vote and otherwise act on behalf of the member who designated that individual to serve as a designee.  Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. b.    The members shall be appointed within 60 days following the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The commission shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of its members and shall select a secretary who need not be a member of the commission.  The presence of five members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.  The commission may conduct business without a quorum, but may only vote on the issuance of the report required to be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to subsection e. of this section, and on any recommendations, when a quorum is present. c.     All commission members shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement of necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes. d.    The commission may meet and hold public hearings at the place or places it designates during the sessions or recesses of the Legislature. e.     The commission shall study the current non-profit hospital property tax exemption law, the modern operation of non-profit hospitals, and how property tax exemption law should be updated in light of modern non-profit hospital operations.  The commission shall issue a report addressing these issues to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), within one year after a quorum is appointed.  The report shall also include proposals on how the non-profit hospital property tax exemption law should be updated, in light of modern non-profit hospital operations, to provide a property tax exemption system that is equitable to non-profit hospitals, municipalities, and taxpayers. f.     The commission shall expire 90 days after the issuance of the report pursuant to subsection e. of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, except that section 1 of this bill shall be retroactive to assessments made as of October 1, 2021.